Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.360

Grants for programs and services—Truant, at-risk, and expelled students.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide, to the extent funds are appropriated, start-up grants for alternative programs and services that provide instruction and learning for truant, at-risk, and expelled students. Each grant application shall contain proposed performance indicators and an evaluation plan to measure the success of the program and its impact on improved student learning. Applications shall contain the applicant's plan for maintaining the program and services after the grant period.

[ 1999 c 319 s 7.]